Idaho, session 2025, S1111.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 6, Title 48, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 48-603H, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
48-603H. TRUTH IN DIGITAL ADVERTISING SALES. (1) For purposes of this
section:
(a) "Ad reach" means the number of unique individuals who see a digital
advertisement.
(b) "Click" means the interaction between a web user and an advertise-
ment on a website that occurs when a user selects an advertisement in or-
der to be taken to a different web page, different portion of a web page,
or a different application.
(c) "Click-through rate" means the ratio of verified and legitimate
clicks to impressions.
(d) "Digital advertisement" means an advertisement on the internet,
including but not limited to websites, mobile applications, connected
television devices, and social media.
(e) "Engagement rate" means the percentage of people who interact with
a digital advertisement.
(f) "Geo-targeted" or "geo-targeting" means a digital advertisement
that is specifically shown to and viewable by users located within a
designated geographic region, including but not limited to a state,
county, zip code, direct marketing area, or latitude and longitude,
allowing the ad to reach people only in such geographical area.
(g) "Impression" means a count of every time an advertisement, post, or
web page is displayed to a user.
(h) "Key performance indicator" means measurable indicators of a digi-
tal advertisement's success, including click-through rate, engagement
rate, length of impressions, and number of impressions.
(i) "Publisher" means an organization that prepares, issues, and dis-
tributes content through online media, such as websites and applica-
tions, and that provides advertising space in exchange for monetary or
valuable consideration.
(j) "Purchaser" means a person or entity who buys opportunities to dis-
play digital advertisements or works with a third party to buy opportu-
nities to display digital advertisements.


(k) "Verify" means a data analysis process through which a nationally
recognized third-party auditor confirms reported key performance indi-
cators. In no event shall the verification process require the disclo-
sure of personal information or proprietary intellectual property to a
purchaser.
(2) Within thirty (30) days after the term of a digital advertisement
expires, the purchaser of such digital advertisement may request verifica-
tion of any representation made by the publisher to the purchaser relating
to:
(a) Geo-targeting and date; and
(b) Key performance indicators, as long as such key performance indi-
cators requested by the purchaser were agreed to and specified in the
original contract between the purchaser and the publisher.
(3) Within thirty (30) days after the receipt of a request for verifica-
tion pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, a publisher shall reply to
the purchaser with verification of geo-targeted impressions by date or other
key performance indicators, as long as the other key performance indicators
were agreed to and specified in an agreement between the purchaser and the
publisher.
(4) A publisher that receives a timely request for verification pur-
suant to subsection (2) of this section and that does not timely provide the
verification required pursuant to subsection (3) of this section commits a
violation of this chapter. Pursuant to section 48-608, Idaho Code, a pur-
chaser of a digital advertisement from a publisher who violates the provi-
sions of this section may bring an action to recover actual damages. Alter-
natively, the purchaser, in lieu of actual damages, may elect to recover a
refund of fees paid for a digital advertisement.
(5) For a period of no more than three (3) months from the date a digital
advertisement was scheduled to end, a publisher who does business in Idaho
shall make available and shall maintain a method for a purchaser of a digi-
tal advertisement to request verification pursuant to subsection (2) of this
section and for such purchaser to receive verification information from a
publisher pursuant to the provisions of subsection (3) of this section.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.